Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Board of Regents and President of the University of Alaska.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 9-17.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 12-16.

Student’s right to compel school officials to issue degree, diploma, or the like. 11 ALR4th 1182.

Sec. 14.40.120.
University governed by Board of Regents.

The University of Alaska shall be governed by a Board of Regents consisting of 11 regents.

History.

(§ 37-10-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.40.130.
Qualifications of regents; special provisions relating to student regent.

Each regent shall be a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state.

In addition to satisfying the requirements of (a) of this section, the regent appointed under AS

14.40.150(b)

must

be enrolled as a full-time student at the University of Alaska at the time of appointment;

remain a full-time student while serving.

Failure of the regent appointed under AS

14.40.150(b)

to remain enrolled as a full-time student at the University of Alaska during the term for which the regent was appointed results in forfeiture of that office.

The governor shall appoint a successor from those students appearing upon the list of nominees submitted under AS

14.40.150(b)

within 60 days of a forfeiture or vacancy in the office.

For purposes of this section, the term “full-time student” is defined as provided in the University of Alaska Academic Regulations.

History.

(§ 37-10-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1977)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Membership on the Board of Regents by a governor, legislator, or judge offends the prohibition against dual office holding. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.40.140.
Term of office.

Except for a student regent as specified in AS

14.40.150(b)

, the term of office of a regent is eight years.
The term of office begins on the first Monday in February of the year in which the appointment is made.
Each regent serves until a successor is appointed and qualifies.

History.

(§ 37-10-3 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1973)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Impeachment is an option that may be pursued in order to remove a regent; however, it is not the only option. The Alaska Constitutional Convention intended to insulate the University from politics, including the governor, intended that the University would not be subject to section 26 of Article III of the Alaska Constitution, and intended to constitutionalize the existence of the University. The University is accorded unique constitutional status; thus, the Governor may only remove a regent if cause is established, preferably at a hearing prior to removal. February 2, 2007 Op. Att’y Gen.

The argument that, under AS

39.05.060(d)

, regents serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed at any time is at odds with the express intention of the constitutional convention that the University be insulated from politics. February 2, 2007 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.40.150.
Appointment of regents.

The governor shall appoint the regents subject to confirmation by a majority of all the members of the legislature in joint session. The names of those appointed shall be sent to the legislature within five days after the opening of the session, for confirmation or rejection. If a person appointed is not confirmed by a majority vote of all the members of the legislature, the appointment ceases and the name of another person shall be submitted within three days after the rejection. If the legislature adjourns without confirming the nominee, or if an interim vacancy occurs, the governor may appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. However, the person who has failed to be confirmed may not be appointed. The term of office of the appointee expires on the fifth day of the session of the legislature following the appointment.

At least one member of the Board of Regents must be a student. The student shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the governor. The governor shall make the appointment from the list within 60 days after it is submitted. The list shall consist of the names of two students from each campus of the University of Alaska after an election is held at each campus. Elections shall be conducted under rules established by the Office of the Governor. The term of office of the regent appointed from the general student body, University of Alaska, is for two years. The term of office begins June 1 of the year in which the appointment is made. An appointment made under AS

14.40.130(d)

shall be for the unexpired term of the original appointee. The term “campus” used in this subsection means a portion of the University of Alaska designated as a “campus” by the Board of Regents.

History.

(§ 37-10-3 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 80 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.40.155.
Suspension and removal of regents.

The governor may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend a member of the Board of Regents while a final disposition is pending on

a criminal complaint, presentment, information, or indictment involving a felony in any jurisdiction;

an information or formal criminal charges of a misdemeanor described under (g)(3) of this section;

a probable cause determination of a knowing ethics violation under AS 39.52 that results in an accusation under consideration before the personnel board;

a written complaint under consideration before the governor, signed under oath by the person making the complaint, that alleges malfeasance or nonfeasance in office as described in (g)(4) of this section, if the governor determines, after an investigation, that there is probable cause to believe that malfeasance or nonfeasance in office has occurred; a determination of probable cause under this paragraph

must specify with particularity the factual basis for the determination;

must include objective evidence of substantial and material malfeasance or nonfeasance; and

may not be based on political differences or the discretionary performance of a lawful act or a prescribed duty; or

a formal allegation or charge by a professional or occupational licensing body alleging or finding a violation of licensing statutes or regulations that is related to the regent’s ability or fitness to serve as a regent.

The governor may remove a member of the Board of Regents for good cause by providing to the member an accusation and an opportunity for a hearing and judicial review.

Notwithstanding the procedure under AS

44.62.390

, a regent who has been suspended under (a) of this section may, at any time, request a hearing to

defend against the grounds for the suspension stated in the accusation; or

lift the suspension.

If a hearing is to be held under this section, the governor shall delegate the conduct of the hearing to the office of administrative hearings under AS

44.64.030(b)

. If a hearing is requested, the hearing officer shall prepare a proposed decision under AS

44.62.500(b)

to remove a regent based on clear and convincing evidence of good cause for removal;

not to remove a regent; or

to continue a suspension or lift a suspension of a regent.

AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

apply to all proceedings under this section.

After a final decision by the governor that suspends a regent under (a) of this section or removes a regent for good cause under (b) of this section, the governor shall file with the lieutenant governor a copy of the allegations made against the former regent, the governor’s findings on each of the allegations, and a complete record of the suspension or removal proceedings.

In this section, “good cause” means

a violation of AS 39.52 (Alaska Executive Branch Ethics Act) that results in a recommendation of removal under AS 39.52.410(b)(3);

a conviction of a felony in any jurisdiction;

a conviction of a misdemeanor in any jurisdiction if the misdemeanor involves

dishonesty;

breach of trust; or

the University of Alaska;

substantial and material malfeasance or nonfeasance in office that is not based on political differences or the discretionary performance of a lawful act or prescribed duty; in this paragraph “malfeasance or nonfeasance in office” includes

misconduct in office;

an inability to serve for an extended period of time;

neglect of duty;

incompetence;

unjustified failure to perform the duties of the Board of Regents;

a violation of a professional or occupational licensing statute or regulation that is related to the regent’s fitness to serve as a regent, resulting in the revocation or suspension of a professional or occupational license issued under state law; or

a failure to possess the qualifications of a regent under AS

14.40.130

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 41 SLA 2012)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 41, SLA 2012, which enacted this section, took effect on August 22, 2012.

Sec. 14.40.160.
Board meetings public; meeting notice; public facilities.

The provisions of AS

44.62.310

apply to meetings of the Board of Regents. All meetings of the board, its committees or subcommittees, are open to the public and press except as otherwise provided in AS

44.62.310(c)

. The findings of an executive session shall be made a part of the record of the proceedings of the Board of Regents. All records of the meetings and proceedings shall be open to inspection by the public and the press at reasonable times.

The Board of Regents may determine the time and place of its meetings. However, 30 days notice is required for all regular meetings and 10 days notice is required for special meetings of the Board of Regents, its committees or subcommittees called under the bylaws or rules or procedure of the Board of Regents. Emergency meetings may be called without notice.

The Board of Regents shall provide adequate facilities for members of the public to attend the meetings of the board, its committees or subcommittees.

History.

(§ 37-10-5 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1972; am § 30 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Sec. 14.40.170.
Duties and powers of Board of Regents.

The Board of Regents shall

appoint the president of the university by a majority vote of the whole board, and the president may attend meetings of the board;

fix the compensation of the president of the university, all heads of departments, professors, teachers, instructors, and other officers;

confer appropriate degrees as it may determine and prescribe;

have the care, control, and management of

all the real and personal property of the university; and

land

conveyed to the Board of Regents by the commissioner of natural resources in the settlement of the claim of the University of Alaska to land granted to the state in accordance with the Act of March 4, 1915 (38 Stat. 1214), as amended, and in accordance with the Act of January 21, 1929 (45 Stat. 1091), as amended; and

conveyed to the Board of Regents in trust for the University of Alaska by the commissioner of natural resources under AS

14.40.365

;

keep a correct and easily understood record of the minutes of every meeting and all acts done by it in pursuance of its duties;

under procedures to be established by the commissioner of administration, and in accordance with existing procedures for other state agencies, have the care, control, and management of all money of the university and keep a complete record of all money received and disbursed;

adopt reasonable rules for the prudent trust management and the long-term financial benefit to the university of the land of the university;

provide public notice of sales, leases, exchanges, and transfers of the land of the university or of interests in land of the university;

administer, manage, market, and promote a postsecondary education savings program, including the Alaska Higher Education Savings Trust under AS

14.40.802

and the Alaska advance college tuition savings fund under AS

14.40.803

—

14.40.817

;

designate buildings owned by the university as covered buildings for purposes of paying the costs of use, management, operation, maintenance, and depreciation from the fund established under AS

37.05.555

.

The Board of Regents may

adopt reasonable rules, orders, and plans with reasonable penalties for the good government of the university and for the regulation of the Board of Regents;

determine and regulate the course of instruction in the university with the advice of the president;

set student tuition and fees;

receive university receipts and, subject to legislative appropriation, expend university receipts in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act);

apply for and use the proceeds of a loan from the Alaska energy efficiency revolving loan fund (AS

18.56.855

).

History.

(§ 37-10-6 ACLA 1949; am §§ 1, 2 ch 46 SLA 1977; am §§ 4, 5 ch 22 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 3 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 8 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (a)(9) was enacted as (a)(10) and renumbered in 2000.

Cross references. —

For duties of board related to sex-based discrimination, see AS

14.18.080

; for definition of university receipts, see AS

14.40.491

; for provisions related to the transfer of land from the commissioner of natural resources to the board of regents, see §§ 1-3 and 7-9, ch. 22, SLA 1983, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, added (b)(5), and made a related change.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 15, 2014, deleted “such” following “confer” in (a)(3), added (a)(10), and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

For salary increases for certain employees of the University of Alaska payable ‘in accordance with the compensation policy of the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska‘ see sec. 22, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 14.40.175.
Indemnification.

The Board of Regents shall insure or indemnify and protect the Board of Regents, any member of the Board of Regents, or any agent or employee of the University of Alaska or of the Board of Regents against financial loss and expense, including reasonable legal fees and costs arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence, alleged violation of civil rights, or alleged wrongful act resulting in death or bodily injury to any person or accidental damage to or destruction of property, inside or outside the university premises, if the Board of Regents member, agent or employee, at the time of the occurrence, was acting under the direction of the Board of Regents within the course or scope of the duties of the member, agent, or employee.

History.

(§ 3 ch 148 SLA 1978)

Collateral references. —

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning. 33 ALR3d 703.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accident occurring during school athletic events. 35 ALR3d 725.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries caused by acts of fellow students. 36 ALR3d 330.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring in physical education classes. 36 ALR3d 361.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring during use of premises and equipment for other than school purposes. 37 ALR3d 712.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries due to condition of grounds, walks, and playgrounds. 37 ALR3d 738.

Immunity of private schools and institutions of higher learning from liability in tort. 38 ALR3d 480.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries resulting from lack or insufficiency of supervision. 38 ALR3d 830.

Liability of university, college, or other school for failure to protect student from crime. 1 ALR4th 1099.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for educational malpractice. 1 ALR4th 1139.

Tort liability of college or university for injury suffered by student as a result of own or fellow student’s intoxication. 62 ALR4th 81.

Sec. 14.40.180.
[Renumbered as AS 14.40.045.]

Sec. 14.40.190.
Report.

The Board of Regents shall prepare a written report at the beginning of each regular session of the legislature of the condition of the university property, of all receipts and expenditures, including the administration and disposition of appropriated and restricted funds and information required under AS

37.25.010(d)

, and of the educational and other work performed during the preceding fiscal year. The board shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

In addition to the report required under (a) of this section, the Board of Regents shall prepare and present to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education a biennial report, not later than the 30th legislative day of the first session of each legislature, titled “Alaska’s University for Alaska’s Schools” that describes the efforts of the university to attract, train, and retain qualified public school teachers. The report must include an outline of the university’s current and future plans to close the gap between known teacher employment vacancies in the state and the number of state residents who complete teacher training. The information reported under this subsection may also include short-term and five-year strategies with accompanying fiscal notes and outcome measures.

History.

(§ 37-10-6 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 13 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 71 SLA 2008)

Sec. 14.40.200.
Quorum.

Corporate business may not be transacted at any meeting of the Board of Regents unless at least six regents are present, the majority of the whole board to approve the same.

History.

(§ 37-10-6 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 1975)

Sec. 14.40.210.
Powers and duties of president of the university; research and development.

The president of the University of Alaska may

give general direction to the work of the University of Alaska in all its departments subject to the approval of the Board of Regents;

appoint the deans, heads of departments, professors, assistants, instructors, tutors, and other officers of the University of Alaska to the positions established by the Board of Regents;

establish procedures for receipt, expenditure, and fiscal year reporting of university receipts;

approve a contract between the University of Alaska and an employee that authorizes the employee to conduct research or other development of intellectual property and to develop, operate, or own a business related to or resulting from the research conducted during the employment; a business described under this paragraph may be jointly owned by the employee and the University of Alaska.

The president of the University of Alaska shall separately account for university receipts deposited in the treasury of the university. The annual estimated balance in the account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the university to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The president of the University of Alaska shall implement a policy and procedure for the acceptance of academic credit toward a degree or technical program offered by the university if an applicant provides satisfactory evidence of successful completion of relevant military education, training, or service as a member of the armed forces of the United States, the United States Reserves, the National Guard of any state, the Military Reserves of any state, or the Naval Militia of any state.

History.

(§ 37-10-7 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1957; am § 22 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For definition of “university receipts,” see AS

14.40.491

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective December 31, 2013, added (c).

Sec. 14.40.220.
Duty of president to define duties and supervise appointees.

The president shall define the duties and supervise the performance of those persons who are appointed by the president to positions established by the Board of Regents.

History.

(§ 37-10-7 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1957)

Sec. 14.40.230.
Powers of regents to remove officers.

The Board of Regents may remove from office any officer of the University of Alaska by a majority vote of the whole board when in its judgment the good of the university requires it.

History.

(§ 37-10-7 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1957)

Sec. 14.40.240.
Power of president to suspend and expel students.

The power to suspend and expel a student for misconduct or other cause and to reinstate the student is vested solely in the president of the University of Alaska. The president may delegate the exercise of the power to the chancellor or another official on each campus of the university or to the administrative head or director of a community college or other campus or extended unit of the university.

History.

(§ 37-10-7 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 1995)

Collateral references. —

Participation of student in demonstration on or near campus as warranting imposition of criminal liability for breach of peace, disorderly conduct, trespass, unlawful assembly, or similar offense. 32 ALR3d 551.

Participation of student in demonstration on or near campus as warranting expulsion or suspension from school or college. 32 ALR3d 864.